Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 7 Family-Planning Services

Cross references.

Female contraceptive devices; insurance coverage, §

33-24-59.6

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Child Welfare and Future Persons,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 367 (2009).

For note, “Conceiving Equality: Infertility-Related Illness Under the Pregnancy Discrimination Act,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1361 (2010).

49-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Family-Planning Services Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 1.

49-7-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Agencies” means the department, county boards of health, health districts, county departments of family and children services, and district departments of family and children services.

“Family-planning services” means counseling and interviews with trained personnel regarding birth control, infertility, and family-planning methods and procedures; distribution of literature relating to birth control, infertility, and family planning; referral to licensed physicians or local health departments for consultation, examination, tests, medical treatment, and prescriptions for the purposes of birth control, infertility, and family planning; and, to the extent prescribed, the distribution of rhythm charts, drugs, medical preparations, contraceptive devices, and similar products used for birth control and family planning.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 2.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Serologic test for syphilis for pregnant women, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-21.

49-7-3.
Persons to whom agencies may offer services.

Within the limitations of the funds available to such agencies, all agencies are authorized to offer family-planning services to any person who is in any one or more of the following classifications:

Married;

The parent of at least one child;

Pregnant; or

Requesting such services.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 558, § 1.

49-7-4.
Services may be free.

Agencies may support family-planning services at no cost to the recipients of such services in accordance with rules and regulations of said agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 4.

49-7-5.
Right to refuse services.

The refusal of any person to accept family-planning services shall in no way affect the right of such person to receive public assistance or public health services or to avail himself of any other public benefit. The employees of the agencies engaged in the administration of this chapter shall recognize that the right to make decisions concerning family planning and birth control is a fundamental personal right of the individual; and nothing in this chapter shall in any way abridge such individual right, nor shall any individual be required to state his reason for refusing the offer of family-planning services.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 5.

49-7-6.
Right of employee to refuse to offer services.

Any employee of the agencies engaged in the administration of this chapter may refuse to accept the duty of offering family-planning services to the extent that such duty is contrary to such employee’s personal religious beliefs; and such refusal shall not be grounds for any disciplinary action, for dismissal, for any interdepartmental transfer, for any other discrimination in his employment, for suspension from employment, or for any loss in pay or other benefits. The directors or supervisors of such agencies shall be authorized, however, to reassign the duties of any such employees in order to carry out this chapter effectively.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 6.

Cross references.

Religious freedom, U.S. Const., amend. 1 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. III.

49-7-7.
Plans and programs to carry out chapter; required provisions.

The department is authorized and directed to develop plans and programs to carry out this chapter. Such plans and programs shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions for:

A training program offered by the department for its employees who are in contact with and counsel those persons likely to desire family-planning services. Such training program should be designed to provide such employees with complete information regarding family planning and birth control and all matters related thereto; and

A systematic plan for coordinating the activities of the department and its counterparts at the county and district level in the area of family-planning services.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 7.

49-7-8.
Rules and regulations.

The board is authorized and directed to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall provide the necessary requirements and guides for county and district departments of health and departments of family and children services.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 8.

49-7-9.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to protect the rights of all individuals to pursue their religious beliefs and to follow the dictates of their own consciences, to prevent the imposition upon any individual of practices offensive to the individual’s moral standards, to respect the right of every individual to self-determination in the procreation of children, and to ensure a complete freedom of choice in pursuance of his constitutional rights.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 228, § 9.